Nebraska, session 109, LB540.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB540 LB540
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 81-2,165.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is amended to read:
81-2,165.01 Sections 81-2,165 to 81-2,180 and sections 3 to 6 of
this act shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Apiary Act.
Sec. 2. Section 81-2,166, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-2,166 For purposes of the Nebraska Apiary Act, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(1) Abandoned apiary means shall mean any apiary not regularly
attended in accordance with good beekeeping practices and which
constitutes a disease, parasite, or pest hazard to the beekeeping
industry;
(2) Apiary means shall mean any place where one or more colonies of
bees or nuclei of bees are located;
(3) Bee equipment means shall mean hives, supers, frames, veils,
gloves, or any other apparatus, tool, machine, vehicle, or device used in
the handling, moving, or manipulating of bees, honey, wax, or hives,
including containers of honey or wax which may be used in any apiary or
in transporting bees and their products and apiary supplies;
(4) Beekeeper means a person who engages in beekeeping;
(5) (4) Beekeeping means shall mean the moving, raising, and
producing of bees, beeswax, and honey which is an agricultural pursuit;
(6) (5) Bees means shall mean any stage of the common honeybee, Apis
mellifera L;
(7) (6) Colony means shall mean the aggregate of worker bees,
drones, the queen, and developing young bees living together as a family
unit in a hive or other dwelling;
(8) (7) Department means shall mean the Department of Agriculture;
(9) (8) Director means shall mean the Director of Agriculture or his
or her designated representative, employee, or authorized agent;
(10) (9) Disease means shall mean American foulbrood, European
-2-

LB540 LB540
2025 2025
foulbrood, chalkbrood, sacbrood, paralysis, or any other abnormal
condition of egg, larva, pupa, or adult stages of bees;
(11) (10) Exotic disease, parasite, or pest means shall mean any
disease, parasite, or pest not known to be established in this state;
(12) (11) Hive means shall mean a frame hive, box hive, box, barrel,
log gum, skep, or any other receptacle or container, natural or
artificial, or any part thereof, which is used or employed as a domicile
for bees;
(13) (12) Nuclei means shall mean a small mass of bees and combs of
brood used in forming a new colony;
(14) (13) Parasite means shall mean any harmful organism living in
or on bees, including, but not limited to, Varroa jacobsoni, Acarapis
woodi, and Tropilaelaps clareae; and
(15) (14) Pest means shall mean any harmful subspecies of the
honeybee Apis mellifera, including, but not limited to, Apis mellifera
scutellata.
Words used in the act shall be construed to import either the plural
or singular, as the case demands.
Sec. 3. (1) The Nebraska Apiary Advisory Board is created.
(2) The Nebraska Apiary Advisory Board shall consist of the director
and the following members appointed by the director:
(a) At least one beekeeper who keeps at least one apiary in Nebraska
and is also an active member of a beekeeping club or organization;
(b) At least one commercial beekeeper who resides in Nebraska; and
(c) At least one beekeeper who keeps bees either as a hobbyist, with
little to no income generated, or as a sideliner, for whom beekeeping
serves as a secondary source of income.
(3) The Nebraska Apiary Advisory Board may include up to one
representative from the University of Nebraska who specializes in
entomology and posses apiculture expertise. Any such representative shall
be invited by the director to be a member of the Nebraska Apiary Advisory
-3-

LB540 LB540
2025 2025
Board. Any such representative shall not be required to serve as a
member.
(4) In the event of a vacancy by an appointed member of the Nebraska
Apiary Advisory Board, the director shall appoint a replacement member to
serve the remainder of the vacating member's term.
(5) The director shall serve as chairperson of the Nebraska Apiary
Advisory Board.
(6) Members of the Nebraska Apiary Advisory Board shall serve
without compensation but shall be entitled to receive reimbursement for
expenses pursuant to sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.
Sec. 4. The objectives of the Nebraska Apiary Advisory Board
include, but are not limited to:
(1) Provide feedback to identify research gaps and prioritize needs
to improve the health and habitat of managed and wild bees in Nebraska;
(2) Provide feedback to determine actionable steps and protection
plans focused on resolving issues identified by the Apiary Advisory
Board; and
(3) Work with the Legislature to achieve a healthy and sustainable
bee population in Nebraska.
Sec. 5. The Nebraska Apiary Advisory Board shall examine existing
statutes, rules, regulations, policies, and practices in Nebraska and the
United States relating to bee populations and make recommendations that
include the following:
(1) How the state should focus efforts relating to understanding,
preventing, and recovering from bee population losses;
(2) The food production systems in Nebraska that rely on bee
populations and the impact on such systems without sufficient bee
populations; and
(3) How the state should develop and coordinate education programs
to promote public knowledge about the effects of the loss of the bee
population and how private individuals and businesses can help address
-4-

LB540 LB540
2025 2025
the loss of the bee populations.
Sec. 6. The Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska shall
create a full-time educator position in the extension service at the
University of Nebraska at Lincoln. In addition to empirical knowledge in
the field of entomology, this educator shall have specific knowledge in
the area of apiculture, and shall be an educational and informational
resource to all patrons of the university system, including hobbyist,
sideliner, and commercial beekeepers.
Sec. 7. Original sections 81-2,165.01 and 81-2,166, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-5-